Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.210

Application of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to an administrative proceeding carried out by the director under this chapter unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

[ 1986 c 14 s 22.]